District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.07

Underground infrastructure improvement projects plan.

(a)

Within 45 days of May 3, 2014, and no later than September 30, 2016, September 30, 2019, and September 30, 2022, the electric company and DDOT shall jointly file with the Commission and concurrently serve upon the OPC an application for approval of their triennial Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan.

(b)

No later than September 30 of each year in which an application for approval of a triennial Underground Infrastructure Improvements Project Plan is not filed, the electric company and DDOT shall file a status report on the completion during the previous year and the scheduled completion during the next year of Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity contained in the current triennial Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan, or an amendment to an Underground Infrastructure Improvements Project Plan as approved by the Commission pursuant to § 34-1313.10.

(c)

As part of the initial application for approval of the triennial Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the electric company shall request authority to impose and collect specified Underground Project Charges from its electric distribution service customers to recover the Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Costs associated with the Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 307, 61 DCR 1882
This section is referenced in § 34-1313.09.